Massachusetts, session 194th, H556.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 71 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 2C, the following section:-
"Section 2D. Each school district in the commonwealth shall provide instruction in
hands-only cardiopulmonary resuscitation and the use of an automated external defibrillator as
part of the existing physical education or health education curriculum in grades 9 through 12.
The school district may select a no-cost, non-certification instructional program to meet this
requirement. The instructional program provided shall be modeled from an instructional program
established by a nationally recognized association with expertise in instruction in
cardiopulmonary resuscitation and the use of an automated external defibrillator and include a
hands-on learning component for each participating student. Each public high school student
shall be required to participate in the instructional program as a requirement for high school
graduation; provided, however, that no student shall be required to take part in the instructional
of 2

program if (i) a licensed physician certifies in writing that such participation would be injurious
to the student; or (ii) a parent or guardian for the student submits a written objection to the
student’s participation in the instructional program."
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect on September 1, 2025.
of 2